extensions/331662_correutor_asturianu/correutor_asturianu-2.70/dictionaries/ast.aff
FLAG long
SFX Vo Y 80
SFX Vo 0 i/LlvM .
SFX Vo ax áxi/XxV3V4 ax
SFX Vo ic íci/XxV3V4 ic
SFX Vo in íni/XxV3V4 in
SFX Vo ix íxi/XxV3V4 ix
SFX Vo ud údi/XxV3V4 ud
SFX Vo up úpi/XxV3V4 up
SFX Vo uv úvi/XxV3V4 uv
SFX Vo ux úxi/XxV3V4 ux
SFX Vo unx únxi/XxV3V4 unx
SFX Vo 0 isti/LlvT .
SFX Vo 0 ísti/XxV7V8 .
SFX Vo 0 iesti/LlvT [^x]
SFX Vo 0 iésti/XxV7V8 [^x]
SFX Vo 0 esti/LlvT x
SFX Vo 0 ésti/XxV7V8 x
SFX Vo 0 o/LlvS [^cn]
SFX Vo c zo/LlvS c
SFX Vo in ieno/LlvS in
SFX Vo ax áxo/XxV1V2 ax
SFX Vo ic ízo/XxV1V2 ic
SFX Vo in iéno/XxV1V2 in
SFX Vo ix íxo/XxV1V2 ix
SFX Vo ud údo/XxV1V2 ud
SFX Vo up úpo/XxV1V2 up
SFX Vo uv úvo/XxV1V2 uv
SFX Vo ux úxo/XxV1V2 ux
SFX Vo unx únxo/XxV1V2 unx
SFX Vo 0 imos .
SFX Vo 0 iemos [^x]
SFX Vo 0 emos x
SFX Vo 0 ímos/XxV5V6 .
SFX Vo 0 iémos/XxV5V6 [^x]
SFX Vo 0 émos/XxV5V6 x
SFX Vo 0 istis .
SFX Vo 0 ístis/XxV9V0 .
SFX Vo 0 iestis [^x]
SFX Vo 0 estis x
SFX Vo 0 iéstis/Xx91V0 [^x]
SFX Vo 0 éstis/XxV9V0 x
SFX Vo 0 ieron/vS [^x]
SFX Vo 0 eron/vS x
SFX Vo 0 iéron/XxV1V2 [^x]
SFX Vo 0 éron/XxV1V2 x
SFX Vo 0 iera/LlvMvS [^x]
SFX Vo 0 era/LlvMvS x
SFX Vo 0 iéra/XxV1V2V3V4 [^x]
SFX Vo 0 éra/XxV1V2V3V4 x
SFX Vo 0 ieras/vT [^x]
SFX Vo 0 eras/vT x
SFX Vo 0 iéras/XxV7V8 [^x]
SFX Vo 0 éras/XxV7V8 x
SFX Vo 0 iéramos/V5V6 [^x]
SFX Vo 0 éramos/V5V6 x
SFX Vo 0 ierais [^x]
SFX Vo 0 erais x
SFX Vo 0 iérais/XxV9V0 [^x]
SFX Vo 0 érais/XxV9V0 x
SFX Vo 0 ieran/vS [^x]
SFX Vo 0 eran/vS x
SFX Vo 0 iéran/XxV1V2 [^x]
SFX Vo 0 éran/XxV1V2 x
SFX Vo 0 iere/LlvMvS [^x]
SFX Vo 0 ere/LlvMvS x
SFX Vo 0 iére/XxV1V2V3V4 [^x]
SFX Vo 0 ére/XxV1V2V3V4 x
SFX Vo 0 ieres/vT [^x]
SFX Vo 0 eres/vT x
SFX Vo 0 iéres/XxV7V8 [^x]
SFX Vo 0 éres/XxV7V8 x
SFX Vo 0 iéremos/V5V6 [^x]
SFX Vo 0 éremos/V5V6 x
SFX Vo 0 iereis [^x]
SFX Vo 0 ereis x
SFX Vo 0 iéreis/XxV9V0 [^x]
SFX Vo 0 éreis/XxV9V0 x
SFX Vo 0 ieren/vS [^x]
SFX Vo 0 eren/vS x
SFX Vo 0 iéren/XxV1V2 [^x]
SFX Vo 0 éren/XxV1V2 x

SFX Vp Y 66
SFX Vp ar ando/Ll ar
SFX Vp ar ándo/XxV1V2V7V8 ar
SFX Vp ar ante/Ll ar
SFX Vp er yendo/Ll [aiou]er
SFX Vp er yéndo/XxV1V2V7V8 [aiou]er
SFX Vp er yente/Ll [aiou]er
SFX Vp er endo/Ll [^r]eer
SFX Vp er éndo/XxV1V2V7V8 [^r]eer
SFX Vp er ente/Ll [^r]eer
SFX Vp er yendo/Ll reer
SFX Vp er yéndo/XxV1V2V7V8 reer
SFX Vp er yente/Ll reer
SFX Vp er iendo/Ll [bcdfgjkmnprstvwz]er
SFX Vp er iéndo/XxV1V2V7V8 [bcdfgjkmnprstvwz]er
SFX Vp er iente/Ll [bcdfgjkmnprstvwz]er
SFX Vp er iendo/Ll [^c]her
SFX Vp er iéndo/XxV1V2V7V8 [^c]her
SFX Vp er iente/Ll [^c]her
SFX Vp er iendo/Ll [^l]ler
SFX Vp er iéndo/XxV1V2V7V8 [^l]ler
SFX Vp er iente/Ll [^l]ler
SFX Vp er endo/Ll [ñxy]er
SFX Vp er éndo/XxV1V2V7V8 [ñxy]er
SFX Vp er ente/Ll [ñxy]er
SFX Vp er endo/Ll cher
SFX Vp er éndo/XxV1V2V7V8 cher
SFX Vp er ente/Ll cher
SFX Vp er endo/Ll ller
SFX Vp er éndo/XxV1V2V7V8 ller
SFX Vp er ente/Ll ller
SFX Vp ír yendo/Ll [aeiou]ír
SFX Vp ír yéndo/XxV1V2V7V8 [aeiou]ír
SFX Vp ír yente/Ll [aeiou]ír
SFX Vp ir iendo/Ll [bcdfgjkmnprstvwz]ir
SFX Vp ir iéndo/XxV1V2V7V8 [bcdfgjkmnprstvwz]ir
SFX Vp ir iente/Ll [bcdfgjkmnprstvwz]ir
SFX Vp ir iendo/Ll [^n]tir
SFX Vp ir iéndo/XxV1V2V7V8 [^n]tir
SFX Vp ir iente/Ll [^n]tir
SFX Vp entir intiendo/Ll entir
SFX Vp entir intiéndo/XxV1V2V7V8 entir
SFX Vp entir intiente/Ll entir
SFX Vp ir iendo/Ll [^e]rir
SFX Vp ir iéndo/XxV1V2V7V8 [^e]rir
SFX Vp ir iente/Ll [^e]rir
SFX Vp erir iriendo/Ll erir
SFX Vp erir iriéndo/XxV1V2V7V8 erir
SFX Vp erir iriente/Ll erir
SFX Vp ir iendo/Ll [^c]hir
SFX Vp ir iéndo/XxV1V2V7V8 [^c]hir
SFX Vp ir iente/Ll [^c]hir
SFX Vp ir iendo/Ll [^l]lir
SFX Vp ir iéndo/XxV1V2V7V8 [^l]lir
SFX Vp ir iente/Ll [^l]lir
SFX Vp ir iendo/Ll guir
SFX Vp ir iéndo/XxV1V2V7V8 guir
SFX Vp ir iente/Ll guir
SFX Vp ir endo/Ll [ñxy]ir
SFX Vp ir éndo/XxV1V2V7V8 [ñxy]ir
SFX Vp ir ente/Ll [ñxy]ir
SFX Vp ir endo/Ll chir
SFX Vp ir éndo/XxV1V2V7V8 chir
SFX Vp ir ente/Ll chir
SFX Vp ir endo/Ll lluir
SFX Vp ir éndo/XxV1V2V7V8 lluir
SFX Vp ir ente/Ll lluir

SFX Vr Y 23
SFX Vr ar áu/V1V2LlAp ar
SFX Vr ar ada/LlApAt ar
SFX Vr ar áda/XxV1V2Ap ar
SFX Vr ar ao/LlAp ar
SFX Vr ar áo/XxV1V2Ap ar
SFX Vr ar aos/Ap ar
SFX Vr ar áos/XxV1V2Ap ar
SFX Vr ar aes/Ap ar
SFX Vr ar áes/XxV1V2Ap ar
SFX Vr er íu/V1V2LlAp er
SFX Vr er ida/LlApAt [^aeiou]er
SFX Vr er ída/XxV1V2Ap [^aeiou]er
SFX Vr er ída/V1V2ApAt [aeiou]er
SFX Vr er ío/V1V2Ap er
SFX Vr er íos/V1V2Ap er
SFX Vr er íes/V1V2Ap er
SFX Vr ir íu/V1V2Ap ir
SFX Vr ir ida/LlApAt [^aeiou]ir
SFX Vr ir ída/XxV1V2Ap [^aeiou]ir
SFX Vr ir ída/V1V2ApAt [aeiou]ir
SFX Vr ir ío/V1V2Ap ir
SFX Vr ir íos/V1V2Ap ir
SFX Vr ir íes/V1V2Ap ir

SFX Vs Y 7
SFX Vs u a/V1V2V7V8Ll .
SFX Vs u o/V1V2V7V8Ll .
SFX Vs u os/V1V2V7V8 .
SFX Vs u es/V1V2V7V8 [^cgz]u
SFX Vs cu ques/V1V2V7V8 cu
SFX Vs gu gues/V1V2V7V8 gu
SFX Vs zu ces/V1V2V7V8 zu

SFX Vt Y 17
SFX Vt r llu/Ll .
SFX Vt r lla/Ll .
SFX Vt r llo/Ll .
SFX Vt r llos .
SFX Vt r lles .
SFX Vt ar áseles ar
SFX Vt er éseles er
SFX Vt ir íseles ir
SFX Vt ar a/XxV1 ar
SFX Vt ar á/XxV2 ar
SFX Vt er e/XxV1 er
SFX Vt er é/XxV2 er
SFX Vt ir i/XxV1 ir
SFX Vt ir í/XxV2 ir
SFX Vt ar ái/V9V0Ll ar
SFX Vt er éi/V9V0Ll er
SFX Vt ir íi/V9V0Ll ir

SFX Vu Y 45
SFX Vu iar ío/V3V4Ll iar
SFX Vu iar íes/V7V8Ll iar
SFX Vu iar ía/V1V2Ll iar
SFX Vu iar íen/V1V2Ll iar
SFX Vu ihar ío/V3V4Ll ihar
SFX Vu ihar íes/V7V8Ll ihar
SFX Vu ihar ía/V1V2Ll ihar
SFX Vu ihar íen/V1V2Ll ihar
SFX Vu uar úo/V3V4Ll uar
SFX Vu uar úes/V7V8Ll uar
SFX Vu uar úa/V1V2Ll uar
SFX Vu uar úen/V1V2Ll uar
SFX Vu uhar úo/V3V4Ll uhar
SFX Vu uhar úes/V7V8Ll uhar
SFX Vu uhar úa/V1V2Ll uhar
SFX Vu uhar úen/V1V2Ll uhar
SFX Vu ar amos ar
SFX Vu ar ámos/XxV5V6 ar
SFX Vu ar áis/V9V0 ar
SFX Vu ier ío/V3V4Ll ier
SFX Vu ier íes/V7V8Ll ier
SFX Vu ier íe/V1V2Ll ier
SFX Vu ier íen/V1V2Ll ier
SFX Vu iher ío/V3V4Ll iher
SFX Vu iher íes/V7V8Ll iher
SFX Vu iher íe/V1V2Ll iher
SFX Vu iher íen/V1V2Ll iher
SFX Vu uher úo/V3V4Ll uher
SFX Vu uher úes/V7V8Ll uher
SFX Vu uher úe/V1V2Ll uher
SFX Vu uher úen/V1V2Ll uher
SFX Vu er emos er
SFX Vu er émos/XxV5V6 er
SFX Vu er éis/V9V0 er
SFX Vu uir úo/V3V4Ll uir
SFX Vu uir úes/V7V8Ll uir
SFX Vu uir úe/V1V2Ll uir
SFX Vu uir úen/V1V2Ll uir
SFX Vu uhir úo/V3V4Ll uhir
SFX Vu uhir úes/V7V8Ll uhir
SFX Vu uhir úe/V1V2Ll uhir
SFX Vu uhir úen/V1V2Ll uhir
SFX Vu ir imos ir
SFX Vu ir ímos/XxV5V6 ir
SFX Vu ir ís/V9V0 ir

PFX vM N 1
PFX vM 0 m'/Ll [aáeéiíoóuúh]

PFX vT N 1
PFX vT 0 t'/Ll [aáeéiíoóuúh]

PFX vS N 1
PFX vS 0 s'/Ll [aáeéiíoóuúh]

SFX Vw Y 57
SFX Vw iar ío/V3V4Ll iar
SFX Vw iar íe/V1V2V3V4Ll iar
SFX Vw iar íes/V7V8 iar
SFX Vw iar ías/V7V8 iar
SFX Vw iar íen/V1V2 iar
SFX Vw iar ían/V1V2 iar
SFX Vw ihar ío/V3V4Ll ihar
SFX Vw ihar íe/V1V2V3V4Ll ihar
SFX Vw ihar íes/V7V8 ihar
SFX Vw ihar ías/V7V8 ihar
SFX Vw ihar íen/V1V2 ihar
SFX Vw ihar ían/V1V2 ihar
SFX Vw uar úo/V3V4Ll uar
SFX Vw uar úe/V1V2V3V4Ll uar
SFX Vw uar úes/V7V8 uar
SFX Vw uar úas/V7V8 uar
SFX Vw uar úen/V1V2 uar
SFX Vw uar úan/V1V2 uar
SFX Vw uhar úo/V3V4Ll uhar
SFX Vw uhar úe/V1V2V3V4Ll uhar
SFX Vw uhar úes/V7V8 uhar
SFX Vw uhar úas/V7V8 uhar
SFX Vw uhar úen/V1V2 uhar
SFX Vw uhar úan/V1V2 uhar
SFX Vw ar emos ar
SFX Vw ar émos/XxV5V6 ar
SFX Vw ar éis/X9X0 ar
SFX Vw ier ío/V3V4Ll ier
SFX Vw ier ía/V1V2V3V4Ll ier
SFX Vw ier ías/V7V8 ier
SFX Vw ier ían/V1V2 ier
SFX Vw iher ío/V3V4Ll iher
SFX Vw iher ía/V1V2V3V4Ll iher
SFX Vw iher ías/V7V8 iher
SFX Vw iher ían/V1V2 iher
SFX Vw uer úo/V3V4Ll uer
SFX Vw uer úa/V1V2V3V4Ll uer
SFX Vw uer úas/V7V8 uer
SFX Vw uer úan/V1V2 uer
SFX Vw uher úo/V3V4Ll uher
SFX Vw uher úa/V1V2V3V4Ll uher
SFX Vw uher úas/V7V8 uher
SFX Vw uher úan/V1V2 uher
SFX Vw er amos er
SFX Vw er ámos/XxV5V6 er
SFX Vw er áis/V9V0 er
SFX Vw uir úo/V3V4Ll uir
SFX Vw uir úa/V1V2V3V4Ll uir
SFX Vw uir úas/V7V8 uir
SFX Vw uir úan/V1V2 uir
SFX Vw uhir úo/V3V4Ll uhir
SFX Vw uhir úa/V1V2V3V4Ll uhir
SFX Vw uhir úas/V7V8 uhir
SFX Vw uhir úan/V1V2 uhir
SFX Vw ir amos ir
SFX Vw ir ámos/XxV5V6 ir
SFX Vw ir áis/V9V0 irsfx vS
