extensions/331662_correutor_asturianu/correutor_asturianu-2.70/dictionaries/ast.dic
abiertu/VsGa st:abrir
acingar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
acisguñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
actuar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
adscritu/VsGa st:adscribir
afiar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
africanizar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
afrisar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aliar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amagayar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
amagazar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
ampliar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
antepunx/XxVoGa st:anteponer
añudar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
añusgar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apurruñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
apusllar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
arriar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aserondar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aserrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aserruchar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
astrix/XxVoGa
atuv/XxVoGa st:atener
atrix/XxVoGa
autografiar/VuVwVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
avanzar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
avaquecer/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
avaqueirar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
averiar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
aviar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
bendix/XxVo st:bendicir
bruar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
buir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
bullir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
caigo/LlvM st:caer
caes/vT st:caer
caen/vS st:caer
caligrafiar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
cayes/vT st:cayer
cayen/vS st:cayer
chaquetiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
chargatiase/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
confiar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
contradix/XxVo st:contradicir
contrax/XxVo st:contrayer
contribuir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
controlar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
contrux/XxVo
convalidar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
cubiertu/XxVs st:cubrir
cup/XxVo st:caber
desafianzar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desafiar/VuVwVjVkVmVpVrVt
desaficionar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desafilvanar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
descaltuv/XxVo st:descaltener
desconfiar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desencamar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desencapotar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
desencariñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
detuv/XxVo st:detener
dexunir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
dialogar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
dibuxar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
dichu/XxVs st:dicir
distrex/XxVo
dix/XxVo st:dicir
empayucar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
empecillar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
empedriar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encoraxar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encorrompinar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
encorteyar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enfriar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enllenar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enllordiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enllortar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
enteabiertu/VsGa st:enteabrir
entreabiertu/VsGa st:entreabrir
envainar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
envasar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
envelenar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
envueltu/XxVsGa st:envolver
escalzar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escamotiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escampar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
escompunx/XxVoGa st:escomponer
escritu/VsGa st:escribir
escuenyar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esculipiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esmadrar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esmanar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
espidiguñar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
espinar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
esquiar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
estrax/XxVoGa st:estrayer
estrueldar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
estrux/XxVoGa
estruxar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
evacuar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
fechu/XxVs st:facer
fiar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
fritu/XxVs st:frir
furtar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
graduar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
impunx/XxVoGa st:imponer
inscritu/VsYs st:inscribir
insertar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
instituir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
instrumentar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
interpunx/XxVoGa st:interponer
litografiar/VuVwVjVkVmVpVrVt
llitografiar/VuVwVjVkVmVpVrVt
malfic/XxVo st:malfacer
muertu/XxVs st:morrer
ñublar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
obsequiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
obsesionar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVtGa
odien/vS st:odiar
odies/vT st:odiar
odian/vS st:odiar
odias/vT st:odiar
opunx/XxVoGa st:oponer
porfiar/VuVwVjVkVmVpVrVt
predix/XxVo st:predicir
provin/XxVo st:provenir
puar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
puestu/XxVs st:poner
radiografiar/VuVwVjVkVmVpVrVt
raes/vT st:raer
raen/vS st:raer
rayes/vT st:rayer
rayen/vS st:rayer
reabiertu/VsGa st:reabrir
rebinxar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
rebodegar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
reborbogar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
recompunx/XxVo st:recomponer
reprodux/XxVo
resfriar/VuVwVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
retrotrix/XxVo
revueltu/XxVs st:revolver
rotu/XxVs st:romper
satisfacer/VbVkVpVrVt
satisfic/XxVo st:satisfacer
secretiar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
sedar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
supunx/XxVo st:suponer
taquigrafiar/VuVwVjVkVmVpVrVt
telegrafiar/VuVwVjVkVmVpVrVt
traes/vT st:traer
traen/vS st:traer
trayes/vT st:trayer
trayen/vS st:trayer
trimir/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
trociar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
tronzar/VaVeVhVjVkVmVpVrVt
trux/XxVo
vistu/LlVs st:ver
vueltu/XxVs st:volver
xilografiar/VuVwVjVkVmVpVrVt
